Missouri, session 2026, HB1665.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 571.107 and 571.215, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 571.107 and 571.215, to read as follows:
571.107. 1. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121,
a valid concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a concealed carry
endorsement or permit issued by another state or political subdivision of another state shall
authorize the person in whose name the permit or endorsement is issued to carry concealed
firearms on or about his or her person or vehicle throughout the state. No concealed carry
permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, valid concealed carry endorsement
issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a concealed carry endorsement or permit issued by another
state or political subdivision of another state shall authorize any person to carry concealed
firearms into:
(1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or station without the consent of the
chief law enforcement officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of a firearm in a
vehicle on the premises of the office or station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(2) Within twenty-five feet of any polling place on any election day. Possession of a
firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the polling place shall not be a criminal offense so
long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
premises;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1665 2
(3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or correctional institution, prison or
jail. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile detention, or
correctional institution, prison or jail shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit, appellate or supreme court, or any
courtrooms, administrative offices, libraries or other rooms of any such court whether or not
such court solely occupies the building in question. This subdivision shall also include, but
not be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other court offices, any room or office wherein
any of the courts or offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily conducting any business
within the jurisdiction of such courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner as
may be specified by supreme court rule pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude those persons listed in subdivision (1) of subsection
2 of section 571.030 while within their jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed in
subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of section 571.030, or such other persons who
serve in a law enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by supreme court rule
pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection from carrying a concealed firearm within any of
the areas described in this subdivision. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of
any of the areas listed in this subdivision shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of local government; or any meeting
of the general assembly or a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in this
subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding a valid concealed carry permit or
endorsement from carrying a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body which he or she is a
member. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense
so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on
the premises. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a member of the general assembly, a
full-time employee of the general assembly employed under Section 17, Article III,
Constitution of Missouri, legislative employees of the general assembly as determined under
section 21.155, or statewide elected officials and their employees, holding a valid concealed
carry permit or endorsement, from carrying a concealed firearm in the state capitol building
or at a meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general assembly or a committee
thereof, that is held in the state capitol building;
(6) The general assembly, supreme court, county or municipality may by rule,
administrative regulation, or ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed firearms by
permit or endorsement holders in that portion of a building owned, leased or controlled by
that unit of government. Any portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed
firearms is prohibited or limited shall be clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to

HB 1665 3
the restricted area. The statute, rule or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public
housing by private persons, highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings
owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government from any restriction on the carrying
or possession of a firearm. The statute, rule or ordinance shall not specify any criminal
penalty for its violation but may specify that persons violating the statute, rule or ordinance
may be denied entrance to the building, ordered to leave the building and if employees of the
unit of government, be subjected to disciplinary measures for violation of the provisions of
the statute, rule or ordinance. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any other
unit of government;
(7) Any establishment licensed to dispense intoxicating liquor for consumption on the
premises, which portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the consent of the
owner or manager. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any bona fide restaurant
open to the general public having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and that
receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual income from the dining facilities by the
sale of food. This subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
premises of the establishment and shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this
subdivision authorizes any individual who has been issued a concealed carry permit or
endorsement to possess any firearm while intoxicated;
(8) Any area of an airport to which access is controlled by the inspection of persons
and property. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the airport shall not be a
criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises;
(9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is prohibited by federal law;
(10) Any higher education institution or elementary or secondary school facility
without the consent of the governing body of the higher education institution or a school
official or the district school board, unless the person with the concealed carry endorsement or
permit is a teacher or administrator of an elementary or secondary school who has been
designated by his or her school district as a school protection officer and is carrying a firearm
in a school within that district, in which case no consent is required. Possession of a firearm
in a vehicle on the premises of any higher education institution or elementary or secondary
school facility shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the
vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(11) Any portion of a building used as a child care facility without the consent of the
manager. Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care facility in a

HB 1665 4
family home from owning or possessing a firearm or a concealed carry permit or
endorsement;
(12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by the public without the consent
of the owner or manager pursuant to rules promulgated by the gaming commission.
Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a riverboat gambling operation shall
not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
while the vehicle is on the premises;
(13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on
the premises of the amusement park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
100 not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
101 (14) Any church or other place of religious worship without the consent of the
102 minister or person or persons representing the religious organization that exercises control
103 over the place of religious worship. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall
104 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
105 while the vehicle is on the premises;
106 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-limits to
107 concealed firearms by means of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
108 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in letters of not
109 less than one inch. The owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private business
110 enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or person may prohibit persons holding a
111 concealed carry permit or endorsement from carrying concealed firearms on the premises and
112 may prohibit employees, not authorized by the employer, holding a concealed carry permit or
113 endorsement from carrying concealed firearms on the property of the employer. If the
114 building or the premises are open to the public, the employer of the business enterprise shall
115 post signs on or about the premises if carrying a concealed firearm is prohibited. Possession
116 of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
117 is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. An
118 employer may prohibit employees or other persons holding a concealed carry permit or
119 endorsement from carrying a concealed firearm in vehicles owned by the employer;
120 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating capacity of five thousand or more.
121 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as
122 the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
123 premises;
124 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
125 premises of a hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
126 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises.

HB 1665 5
127 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location specified in subdivisions (1) to (17)
128 of subsection 1 of this section by any individual who holds a concealed carry permit issued
129 pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
130 August 28, 2013, shall not be a criminal act but may subject the person to denial to the
131 premises or removal from the premises. If such person refuses to leave the premises and a
132 peace officer is summoned, such person may be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed
133 one hundred dollars for the first offense. If a second citation for a similar violation occurs
134 within a six-month period, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed two hundred
135 dollars and his or her permit, and, if applicable, endorsement to carry concealed firearms shall
136 be suspended for a period of one year. If a third citation for a similar violation is issued
137 within one year of the first citation, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed five
138 hundred dollars and shall have his or her concealed carry permit, and, if applicable,
139 endorsement revoked and such person shall not be eligible for a concealed carry permit for a
140 period of three years. Upon conviction of charges arising from a citation issued pursuant to
141 this subsection, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county which issued the concealed
142 carry permit, or, if the person is a holder of a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
143 August 28, 2013, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county which issued the certificate of
144 qualification for a concealed carry endorsement and the department of revenue. The sheriff
145 shall suspend or revoke the concealed carry permit or, if applicable, the certificate of
146 qualification for a concealed carry endorsement. If the person holds an endorsement, the
147 department of revenue shall issue a notice of such suspension or revocation of the concealed
148 carry endorsement and take action to remove the concealed carry endorsement from the
149 individual's driving record. The director of revenue shall notify the licensee that he or she
150 must apply for a new license pursuant to chapter 302 which does not contain such
151 endorsement. The notice issued by the department of revenue shall be mailed to the last
152 known address shown on the individual's driving record. The notice is deemed received three
153 days after mailing.
154 3. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, no
155 homeowners' association, condominium owners' association, property owners'
156 association, master association, or any other similar superordinate entity shall, by
157 rule, policy, covenant, deed, contract, or any other similar instrument or method,
158 infringe upon the right to carry concealed firearms of any person who:
159 (a) Is an owner or occupant of a condominium or house within or under the
160 control, authority, limits, or oversight of any such association or entity; and
161 (b) Is lawfully in possession of a valid concealed carry permit issued under
162 sections 571.101 to 571.121, a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28,

HB 1665 6
163 2013, or a valid concealed carry permit or endorsement issued by another state or a
164 political subdivision of another state.
165 (2) The prohibition on any infringement on the right to carry concealed firearms
166 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall extend to privately owned property,
167 common elements, limited common elements, parking areas, and all ingress and egress
168 routes, paths, and areas regardless of use, purpose, activity, necessity, convenience, or
169 alternative.
571.215. 1. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit issued under
sections 571.205 to 571.230 shall authorize the person in whose name the permit is issued to
carry concealed firearms on or about his or her person or vehicle throughout the state. No
Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall authorize any person to carry
concealed firearms into:
(1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or station without the consent of the
chief law enforcement officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of a firearm in a
vehicle on the premises of the office or station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(2) Within twenty-five feet of any polling place on any election day. Possession of a
firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the polling place shall not be a criminal offense so
long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
premises;
(3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or correctional institution, prison or
jail. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile detention, or
correctional institution, prison or jail shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit, appellate or supreme court, or any
courtrooms, administrative offices, libraries, or other rooms of any such court whether or not
such court solely occupies the building in question. This subdivision shall also include, but
not be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other court offices, any room or office wherein
any of the courts or offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily conducting any business
within the jurisdiction of such courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner as
may be specified by supreme court rule under subdivision (6) of this subsection. Nothing in
this subdivision shall preclude those persons listed in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
section 571.030 while within their jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed in
subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of section 571.030, or such other persons who
serve in a law enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by supreme court rule
under subdivision (6) of this subsection from carrying a concealed firearm within any of the
areas described in this subdivision. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of

HB 1665 7
any of the areas listed in this subdivision shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of local government, or any meeting
of the general assembly or a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in this
subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding a valid Missouri lifetime or
extended concealed carry permit from carrying a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body
which he or she is a member. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be
a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a member of the
general assembly, a full-time employee of the general assembly employed under Section 17,
Article III, Constitution of Missouri, legislative employees of the general assembly as
determined under section 21.155, or statewide elected officials and their employees, holding a
valid Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit, from carrying a concealed firearm
in the state capitol building or at a meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general
assembly or a committee thereof, that is held in the state capitol building;
(6) The general assembly, supreme court, county, or municipality may by rule,
administrative regulation, or ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed firearms by
permit holders in that portion of a building owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of
government. Any portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed firearms is
prohibited or limited shall be clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to the restricted
area. The statute, rule, or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public housing by
private persons, highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings owned, leased, or
controlled by that unit of government from any restriction on the carrying or possession of a
firearm. The statute, rule, or ordinance shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation
but may specify that persons violating the statute, rule, or ordinance may be denied entrance
to the building, ordered to leave the building and if employees of the unit of government, be
subjected to disciplinary measures for violation of the provisions of the statute, rule, or
ordinance. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any other unit of government;
(7) Any establishment licensed to dispense intoxicating liquor for consumption on the
premises, which portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the consent of the
owner or manager. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any bona fide restaurant
open to the general public having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and that
receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual income from the dining facilities by the
sale of food. This subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
premises of the establishment and shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this

HB 1665 8
subdivision authorizes any individual who has been issued a Missouri lifetime or extended
concealed carry permit to possess any firearm while intoxicated;
(8) Any area of an airport to which access is controlled by the inspection of persons
and property. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the airport shall not be a
criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises;
(9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is prohibited by federal law;
(10) Any higher education institution or elementary or secondary school facility
without the consent of the governing body of the higher education institution or a school
official or the district school board, unless the person with the Missouri lifetime or extended
concealed carry permit is a teacher or administrator of an elementary or secondary school
who has been designated by his or her school district as a school protection officer and is
carrying a firearm in a school within that district, in which case no consent is required.
Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any higher education institution or
elementary or secondary school facility shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(11) Any portion of a building used as a child care facility without the consent of the
manager. Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care facility in a
family home from owning or possessing a firearm or a Missouri lifetime or extended
concealed carry permit;
(12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by the public without the consent
of the owner or manager under rules promulgated by the gaming commission. Possession of
a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a riverboat gambling operation shall not be a
criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
the vehicle is on the premises;
(13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on
the premises of the amusement park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
(14) Any church or other place of religious worship without the consent of the
minister or person or persons representing the religious organization that exercises control
over the place of religious worship. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall
not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
100 while the vehicle is on the premises;
101 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-limits to
102 concealed firearms by means of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
103 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in letters of not
104 less than one inch. The owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private business

HB 1665 9
105 enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or person may prohibit persons holding a
106 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed firearms on the
107 premises and may prohibit employees, not authorized by the employer, holding a Missouri
108 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed firearms on the property
109 of the employer. If the building or the premises are open to the public, the employer of the
110 business enterprise shall post signs on or about the premises if carrying a concealed firearm is
111 prohibited. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal
112 offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle
113 is on the premises. An employer may prohibit employees or other persons holding a Missouri
114 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit from carrying a concealed firearm in vehicles
115 owned by the employer;
116 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating capacity of five thousand or more.
117 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as
118 the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
119 premises;
120 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
121 premises of a hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
122 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises.
123 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location specified in subdivisions (1) to (17)
124 of subsection 1 of this section by any individual who holds a Missouri lifetime or extended
125 concealed carry permit shall not be a criminal act but may subject the person to denial to the
126 premises or removal from the premises. If such person refuses to leave the premises and a
127 peace officer is summoned, such person may be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed
128 one hundred dollars for the first offense. If a second citation for a similar violation occurs
129 within a six-month period, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed two hundred
130 dollars and his or her permit to carry concealed firearms shall be suspended for a period of
131 one year. If a third citation for a similar violation is issued within one year of the first
132 citation, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars and shall
133 have his or her Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit revoked and such person
134 shall not be eligible for a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or a concealed
135 carry permit issued under sections 571.101 to 571.121 for a period of three years. Upon
136 conviction of charges arising from a citation issued under this subsection, the court shall
137 notify the sheriff of the county which issued the Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
138 carry permit. The sheriff shall suspend or revoke the Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
139 carry permit.
140 3. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, no
141 homeowners' association, condominium owners' association, property owners'

HB 1665 10
142 association, master association, or any other similar superordinate entity shall, by rule,
143 policy, covenant, deed, contract, or any other similar instrument or method, infringe
144 upon the right to carry concealed firearms of any person who:
145 (a) Is an owner or occupant of a condominium or house within or under the
146 control, authority, limits, or oversight of any such association or entity; and
147 (b) Is lawfully in possession of a valid Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
148 carry permit.
149 (2) The prohibition on any infringement on the right to carry concealed firearms
150 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall extend to privately owned property,
151 common elements, limited common elements, parking areas, and all ingress and egress
152 routes, paths, and areas regardless of use, purpose, activity, necessity, convenience, or
153 alternative.
✔